Hawaii statutes.
[§111-11] Fund availability. The state
agency shall include the cost specified in this chapter as a part of the cost
of construction of the project for which a land acquisition program is
initiated, or as part of the cost of any other program which displaces
persons. Any funds appropriated or otherwise available to any state agency for
a particular program or project shall be available also for obligation and
expenditure to carry out the provisions of this chapter as applied to that
program or project. [L 1970, c 166, §11]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next